District of Columbia statutes.
29-306.21

Action without meeting.

(a)

Except to the extent that the articles of incorporation or bylaws require that action by the board of directors be taken at a meeting, action required or permitted by this chapter to be taken by the board of directors may be taken without a meeting if each director signs a consent in a record describing the action to be taken and delivers it to the corporation.

(b)

Action taken under this section shall be the act of the board of directors when one or more consents signed by all the directors are delivered to the corporation. The consent may specify the time at which the action taken thereunder is to be effective. A director’s consent may be withdrawn by a revocation signed by the director and delivered to the corporation prior to delivery to the corporation of unrevoked consents in a record signed by all the directors.

(c)

A consent signed under this section shall have the effect of action taken at a meeting of the board of directors and may be described as such in any document.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(c)(18), 59 DCR 13171
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “consent in a record” for “consent” in (a); and substituted “consents in a record” for “written consents” in (b).
Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.